Utah statutes.
34-40-205.   Civil action allowed.

(1)  In addition to the administrative and criminal actions authorized by this chapter, an employee may bring a civil action to enforce his rights under this chapter.

(2) (a)  An aggrieved employee is entitled to injunctive relief and may recover the difference between the wage paid and the minimum wage, plus interest.

(b)  The court may award court costs and attorney fees to the prevailing party.

(3)  An action brought under this section shall be brought within two years of the alleged violation.

